Oklahoma, session 2025, SB417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101, as
last amended by Section 34, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101. A. No person, except those hereinafter
expressly exempted in Sections 6-102 and 6-102.1 of this title,
shall operate any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless
the person has a valid Oklahoma driver license for the class of
vehicle being operated under the provisions of this title. No
person shall be permitted to possess more than one valid license at
any time, except as provided in paragraph 4 of subsection F of this
section.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. 1. No person shall operate a Class A commercial motor
vehicle unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and
holds a valid Class A commercial license, except as provided in
paragraph 5 of this subsection and subsection F of this section.
Any person holding a valid Class A commercial license shall be
permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes A, B, C, and D,
except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.
2. No person shall operate a Class B commercial motor vehicle
unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a
valid Class B commercial license, except as provided in paragraph 5
of subsection F of this section. Any person holding a valid Class B
commercial license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in
Classes B, C, and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this
subsection.
3. No person shall operate a Class C commercial motor vehicle
unless the person is eighteen (18) years of age or older and holds a
valid Class C commercial license, except as provided in subsection F
of this section. Any person holding a valid Class C commercial
license shall be permitted to operate motor vehicles in Classes C
and D, except as provided for in paragraph 4 of this subsection.
4. No person under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be
licensed to operate any motor vehicle which is required to be
placarded for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172,
subpart F, except as provided in subsection F of this section;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov ided, a person eighteen (18) years of age or older may be
licensed to operate a farm vehicle which is required to be placarded
for hazardous materials pursuant to 49 C.F.R., Part 172, subpart F,
except as provided in subsection F of this section.
5. A person at least seventeen (17) years of age who
successfully completes all examinations required by law may be
issued by Service Oklahoma:
a. a restricted Class A commercial license which shall
grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class
A or Class B commercial motor vehicle for harvest
purposes or a Class D motor vehicle, or
b. a restricted Class B commercial license which shall
grant to the licensee the privilege to operate a Class
B commercial motor vehicle for harvest purposes or a
Class D motor vehicle.
6. No person shall operate a Class D motor vehicle unless the
person is sixteen (16) years of age or older and holds a valid Class
D license, except as provided for in Section 6-102 or 6-105 of this
title. Any person holding a valid Class D license shall be
permitted to operate motor vehicles in Class D only.
C. Any person issued a driver license pursuant to this section
may exercise the privilege thereby granted upon all streets and
highways in this state.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. No person shall operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
without having a valid Class A, B, C, or D license with a motorcycle
endorsement. Except as otherwise provided by law, any new applicant
for an original driver license shall be required to successfully
complete a written examination, vision examination, and driving
examination for a motorcycle as prescribed by the Department of
Public Safety, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, and a certified
state-approved motorcycle basic rider course approved by the
Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma, if the applicant
is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to be eligible for a
motorcycle endorsement thereon. The written examination and driving
examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service Oklahoma
upon verification that the person has successfully completed a
certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course approved by the
Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.
E. Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who lawfully
possesses a valid Oklahoma driver license which is eligible for
renewal shall be required to successfully complete a written
examination, vision examination, and driving examination for a
motorcycle as prescribed by the Department, in conjunction with
Service Oklahoma, and a certified state-approved motorcycle basic
rider course approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service
Oklahoma, if the person is seventeen (17) years of age or younger to
be eligible for a motorcycle endorsement. The written examination
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and driving examination for a motorcycle shall be waived by Service
Oklahoma upon verification that the person has successfully
completed a certified Motorcycle Safety Foundation rider course
approved by the Department, in conjunction with Service Oklahoma.
F. 1. Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older may apply
for a restricted Class A, B, or C commercial learner permit.
Service Oklahoma, after the applicant has passed all parts of the
examination for a Class D license and has successfully passed all
parts of the examination for a Class A, B, or C commercial license
other than the driving examination, may issue to the applicant a
commercial learner permit which shall entitle the person having
immediate lawful possession of the commercial learner permit and a
valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional driver license pursuant
to Section 6-212 of this title to operate a Class A, B, or C
commercial motor vehicle upon the public highways solely for the
purpose of behind-the-wheel training in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Department.
2. This commercial learner permit shall be issued for a period
as provided in Section 6-115 of this title of one year; provided,
such commercial learner permit may be suspended, revoked, canceled,
denied, or disqualified at the discretion of the Department, with
notice to Service Oklahoma, for violation of the restrictions, for
failing to give the required or correct information on the
application, or for violation of any traffic laws of this state
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pert aining to the operation of a motor vehicle. Except as otherwise
provided, the lawful possessor of a commercial learner permit who
has been issued a commercial learner permit for a minimum of
fourteen (14) days may have the restriction requiring an
accompanying driver removed by satisfactorily completing a driver’s
examination; provided, the removal of a restriction shall not
authorize the operation of a Class A, B, or C commercial motor
vehicle if such operation is otherwise prohibited by law.
3. No person shall apply for and Service Oklahoma shall not
issue an original Class A, B, or C driver license until the person
has been issued a commercial learner permit and held the permit for
at least fourteen (14) days. Any person who currently holds a Class
B or C license and who wishes to apply for another class of
commercial driver license shall be required to apply for a
commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at least
fourteen (14) days before applying for the Class A or B license, as
applicable. Any person who currently holds a Class A, B, or C
license and who wishes to add an endorsement or remove a restriction
for which a skills examination is required shall be required to
apply for a commercial learner permit and to hold the permit for at
least fourteen (14) days before applying for the endorsement.
4. A commercial learner permit shall be issued by Service
Oklahoma as a separate and unique document which shall be valid only
in conjunction with a valid Oklahoma driver license or provisional
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

driv er license pursuant to Section 6-212 of this title, both of
which shall be in the possession of the person to whom they have
been issued whenever that person is operating a commercial motor
vehicle as provided in this subsection.
5. After one renewal of a commercial learner permit, as
provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, a commercial permit
shall not be renewed again. Any person who has held a commercial
learner permit for the initial issuance period and one renewal
period shall not be eligible for and Service Oklahoma shall not
issue another renewal of the permit; provided, the person may
reapply for a new commercial learner permit, as provided for in this
subsection.
G. 1. For purposes of this title:
a. “REAL ID Compliant Driver License” License or
“Identification Identification Card” means a driver
license or identification card issued by this state
that has been certified by the United States
Department of Homeland Security (USDHS) as compliant
with the requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005,
Public Law No. 109-13. A REAL ID Compliant Driver
License or Identification Card and the process through
which it is issued incorporate a variety of security
measures designed to protect the integrity and
trustworthiness of the license or card. A REAL ID
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Compliant Driver License or Identification Card will
be clearly marked on the face indicating that it is a
compliant document, and
b. “REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License” License or
“Identification Identification Card” means a driver
license or identification card issued by this state
that has not been certified by the United States
Department of Homeland Security (USDHS) as being
compliant with the requirements of the REAL ID Act of
2005. A REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or
Identification Card will be clearly marked on the face
indicating that it is not compliant with the federal
REAL ID Act of 2005 and is not acceptable for official
federal purposes. The driver license or
identification card will have a unique design or color
indicator that clearly distinguishes it from a
compliant license or card.
2. Original Driver License and Identification Card Issuance:
a. Application for an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL
ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
shall be made to Service Oklahoma or a licensed
operator provided such licensed operator is authorized
to process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver
Licenses and Identification Cards. Application for a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification
Card shall be made to Service Oklahoma.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed
operators shall perform all document recognition and
other requirements needed for approval of an original
REAL ID Compliant Driver License or Identification
Card application. Service Oklahoma employees shall
perform all document recognition and other
requirements needed for approval of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application.
c. Upon approval of an original REAL ID Compliant or REAL
ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may take the approved
application document to a licensed operator to receive
a temporary driver license or identification card.
d. The licensed operator shall process the approved REAL
ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or
Identification Card application and upon payment shall
provide the applicant a temporary driver license or
identification card. A temporary driver license or
identification card shall afford the holder the
privileges otherwise granted by the specific class of
driver license or identification card for the period
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of time listed on the temporary driver license or
identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card,
whichever time period is shorter.
3. REAL ID Compliant Driver License and Identification Card
Renewal and Replacement:
a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID
Compliant Driver License or Identification Card may be
made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator;
provided, such licensed operator is authorized to
process application for REAL ID Compliant Driver
Licenses and Identification Cards. A licensed
operator may process the voluntary downgrade of a REAL
ID Compliant Commercial Driver License to any lower
class license upon request of the licensee;, provided,
no additional endorsements or restrictions are placed
on the license.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or authorized licensed
operators shall perform all document recognition and
other requirements needed for approval of a renewal or
replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card application.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID
Compliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may receive a temporary
driver license or identification card from Service
Oklahoma or an authorized licensed operator.
d. A temporary driver license or identification card
acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall
afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by
the specific class of driver license or identification
card being renewed or replaced for the period of time
listed on the temporary driver license or
identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Compliant Driver License
or Identification Card, whichever time period is
shorter.
e. For purposes of this title, an application for a REAL
ID Compliant Driver License or Identification Card by
an individual with a valid Oklahoma-issued driver
license or identification card shall be considered a
renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card.
4. REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License and Identification Card
Renewal and Replacement:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. Application for renewal or replacement of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card may
be made to Service Oklahoma or to a licensed operator.
A licensed operator may process the voluntary
downgrade of a REAL ID Noncompliant Commercial Driver
License to any lower class license upon request of the
licensee;, provided, no additional endorsements or
restrictions are added to the license.
b. Service Oklahoma employees or licensed operators shall
perform all document recognition and other
requirements needed for approval of a renewal or
replacement REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or
Identification Card application.
c. Upon approval of a renewal or replacement REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License or Identification Card
application, the applicant may receive a temporary
driver license or identification card from Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator.
d. A temporary driver license or identification card
acquired under the provisions of this paragraph shall
afford the holder the privileges otherwise granted by
the specific class of driver license or identification
card being renewed or replaced for the period of time
listed on the temporary driver license or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

identification card or the period of time prior to the
applicant receiving a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
License or Identification Card, whichever time period
is shorter.
H. 1. The fee charged for an approved application for an
original Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
License or an approved application for the addition of an
endorsement to a current valid Oklahoma REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver License shall be assessed in accordance with the
following schedule:
Class A Commercial Learner
Permit $25.00
Class A Commercial License $25.00
Class B Commercial Learner
Permit $15.00
Class B Commercial License $15.00
Class C Commercial Learner
Permit $15.00
Class C Commercial License $15.00
Class D License $ 4.00
Motorcycle Endorsement $ 4.00
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this
title, all monies collected from the fees charged for Class A, B,
and C commercial licenses pursuant to the provisions of this
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

subs ection shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this
state.
I. The fee charged for any failed examination shall be Four
Dollars ($4.00) for any license classification. Notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 1104 of this title, all monies collected from
such examination fees pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of this state.
J. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of
subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or
renewal of a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License shall be in
accordance with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant
who has a CDL Commercial Learner Permit shall be charged only the
replacement fee for the issuance of the license:
License Class 4-year 8-year
Class A Commercial Learner
Permit $56.50 $113.00
Class A Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
Class B Commercial Learner
Permit $56.50 $113.00
Class B Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
Class C Commercial Learner
Permit $46.50 $93.00
Class C Commercial License $46.50 $93.00
Class D License $38.50 $77.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

K. In addition to any fee charged pursuant to the provisions of
subsection H of this section, the fee charged for the issuance or
renewal of a REAL ID Compliant Driver License shall be in accordance
with the following schedule; provided, that any applicant who has a
CDL Commercial Learner Permit shall be charged only the replacement
fee for the issuance of the license:
License Class 4-year 8-year
REAL ID Compliant Class A
Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class A
Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class B
Commercial Learner Permit $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class B
Commercial License $56.50 $113.00
REAL ID Compliant Class C
Commercial Learner Permit $46.50 $93.00
REAL ID Compliant Class C
Commercial License $46.50 $93.00
REAL ID Compliant Class D
License $38.50 $77.00
L. A commercial learner permit may be renewed one time for a
period of one hundred eighty (180) days. The cost for the renewed
permit shall be the same as for the original permit.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

M. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this
title, of each fee charged pursuant to the provisions of subsections
J, K, and L of this section:
1. Five Dollars and fifty cents ($5.50) of a 4-year four-year
license or Eleven Dollars ($11.00) of an 8-year eight-year license
shall be deposited to the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund
created in Section 1-2530.9 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Six Dollars and seventy-five cents ($6.75) of a 4-year four-
year license or Thirteen Dollars and fifty cents ($13.50) of an 8-
year eight-year license shall be deposited to the Department of
Public Safety Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used
solely for the purpose of administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of the Department through October 31,
2022. Beginning November 1, 2022, Six Dollars and seventy-five
cents ($6.75) of a 4-year four-year license or Thirteen Dollars and
fifty cents ($13.50) of an 8-year eight-year license shall be
deposited to the Service Oklahoma Computer Imaging System Revolving
Fund to be used solely for the purpose of administration and
maintenance of the computerized imaging system of Service Oklahoma;
3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year four-year license or Twenty
Dollars ($20.00) of an 8-year eight-year license shall be deposited
to the Department of Public Safety Revolving Fund for all original
or renewal issuances of licenses through October 31, 2022.
Beginning November 1, 2022, Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year four-
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

year license or Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of an 8-year eight-year
license shall be deposited to the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund
for all original or renewal issuances of licenses; and
4. Five Dollars ($5.00) of a 4-year four-year license or Six
Dollars ($6.00) of an 8-year eight-year license shall be deposited
to the State Public Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this
title.
N. All original and renewal driver licenses shall expire as
provided in Section 6-115 of this title.
O. 1. Through May 31, 2025, any person sixty-two (62) to
sixty-four (64) years of age during the calendar year of issuance or
renewal of a Class D license or motorcycle endorsement shall be
charged the following prorated fee:
4-year 8-year
Age 62 $21.25 $42.50
Age 63 $17.50 $35.00
Age 64 $13.75 $27.50
2. Any person sixty-five (65) years of age or older during the
calendar year of issuance or renewal of a Class D license or
motorcycle endorsement shall not be charged a fee.
P. No person who has been honorably discharged from active
service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or
Oklahoma National Guard and who has been certified by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs, its successor, or the Armed
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Forc es of the United States to be a disabled veteran in receipt of
compensation at the one-hundred-percent rate for a permanent
disability sustained through military action or accident resulting
from disease contracted while in such active service and registered
with the veterans registry created by the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs shall be charged a fee for the issuance,
replacement, or renewal of an Oklahoma driver license; provided,
that if a veteran has been previously exempt from a fee pursuant to
this subsection, no registration with the veterans registry shall be
required.
Q. In accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this
section, Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate rules for the
issuance and renewal of driver licenses authorized pursuant to the
provisions of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title; provided,
that no such rules applicable to the issuance or renewal of REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver Licenses shall create more stringent standards
than such rules applicable as of January 1, 2017, unless directly
related to a specific change in statutory law concerning standards
for REAL ID Noncompliant Driver Licenses. Applications, upon forms
approved by Service Oklahoma, for such licenses shall be handled, in
accordance with the provisions of subsection G of this section, by
the licensed operator; provided, Service Oklahoma is authorized to
assume these duties in any county of this state. Each licensed
operator accepting applications for driver licenses shall receive
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Six Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year four-year REAL ID Noncompliant
Driver License or Twelve Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year eight-year
REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or Ten Dollars ($10.00) for a 4-
year four-year REAL ID Compliant Driver License or Twenty Dollars
($20.00) for an 8-year eight-year REAL ID Compliant Driver License
to be deducted from the total collected for each license or renewal
application accepted through June 30, 2023. Beginning July 1, 2022,
and ending on June 30, 2023, each motor license agent or licensed
operator accepting applications for driver licenses for individuals
over the age of sixty-five (65) years or for applications for
drivers pursuant to subsection P of this section shall receive Six
Dollars ($6.00) for a 4-year four-year driver license or Twelve
Dollars ($12.00) for an 8-year eight-year driver license to be
deducted daily by the motor license agent or licensed operator
receipts. Beginning July 1, 2023, these fees shall be retained by
the licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of
this title. The fees received by the licensed operator, authorized
by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses. The
amount retained pursuant to this subsection shall not be retained by
any state agency. The fees received by the licensed operator,
authorized by this subsection, shall be used for operating expenses.
For purposes of this subsection, “licensed operator” shall mean an
individual who obtains a license from the Service Oklahoma Operator
Board to operate a designated Service Oklahoma location and offers
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

thir d-party fulfillment of designated services to be rendered by
Service Oklahoma.
R. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1104 of this title
and subsection Q of this section and except as provided in
subsections H and M of this section, the first Sixty Thousand
Dollars ($60,000.00) of all monies collected pursuant to this
section shall be paid by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to the State
Treasurer to be deposited in the General Revenue Fund of the State
Treasury.
The next Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) of monies
collected pursuant to this section shall be paid by the Tax
Commission to the State Treasurer to be deposited each fiscal year
under the provisions of this section to the credit of the Department
of Public Safety Restricted Revolving Fund for the purpose of the
Oklahoma Law Enforcement Telecommunications System. All other
monies collected in excess of Five Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars
($560,000.00) each fiscal year shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title, except as otherwise provided in this
section.
S. Service Oklahoma shall retain the images displayed on
licenses and identification cards issued pursuant to the provisions
of Sections 6-101 through 6-309 of this title which may be used
only:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. By a law enforcement agency for purposes of criminal
investigations, missing person investigations, or any law
enforcement purpose which is deemed necessary by the Commissioner of
Public Safety;
2. By the driver licensing agency of another state for its
official purpose; and
3. As provided in Section 2-110 of this title.
All agencies approved by the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Telecommunications System (OLETS) or the National Law Enforcement
Telecommunications System (NLETS) to receive photographs or
computerized images may obtain them through OLETS or through NLETS.
Photographs or computerized images may be obtained by law
enforcement one inquiry at a time.
The computer system and related equipment acquired for this
purpose must conform to industry standards for interoperability and
open architecture. The Department of Public Safety may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.
T. No person may hold more than one state-issued or territory-
issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card from Oklahoma or any other state or territory.
Service Oklahoma shall not issue a REAL ID Compliant Driver License
to a person who has been previously issued a REAL ID Compliant
Driver License or REAL ID Compliant Identification Card until such
license or identification card has been surrendered to Service
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Okla homa by the applicant. Service Oklahoma may promulgate rules
related to the issuance of replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver
Licenses in the event of loss or theft.
U. Beginning May 24, 2021, and ending on June 30, 2023, in
addition to the amounts provided in subsection Q of this section, a
licensed operator shall receive Five Dollars ($5.00) for each
processed application for a four-year REAL ID Compliant 4-year
Driver License and Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each processed
application for a an eight-year REAL ID Compliant 8-year Driver
License. Any additional amounts provided pursuant to this
subsection shall not be retained by Service Oklahoma.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB417 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)